Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202515-301
Elections; when held.

The general city elections in cities of the primary class shall be held on the first Tuesday in May of every odd-numbered year or, by provision of such city's home rule charter, in conjunction with the statewide general election. All city elections shall be conducted in accordance with the Election Act.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 12, p. 74;

Laws 1905, c. 16, § 1 1/2, p. 200;

Laws 1905, c. 17, § 1, p. 213;

R.S.1913, § 4478;

C.S.1922, § 3864;

C.S.1929, § 15-301;

R.S.1943, § 15-301;

Laws 1961, c. 36, § 4, p. 162;

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 40;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 481;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 17.

City council, election, see section 32-535.

Election Act, see section 32-101.

Home rule charter, election provisions, see sections 32-501, 32-537, 32-556, 32-568, 32-606, 32-608, and 32-1302.

Vacancies, see sections 32-568 and 32-569.